Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 31-25-27.
Powers of local governmental units to contract with bank; issuance of securities; pledges for repayment; personal liability of local governmental officials; validation of securities; waiver of defenses; fraudulent acts; agreements with regard to powers of State Tax Commission; certain local governmental units required to make certifications to Mississippi Development Bank before issuance of bonds; local governmental units authorized to borrow money from any United States government loan guarantee program.

Each local governmental unit is hereby authorized and empowered to contract with the bank with respect to the bank’s purchase of such local governmental unit’s securities and such contract shall contain such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the bank. Each local governmental unit is authorized and empowered to pay to the bank such fees and charges for services as the bank may prescribe.

Each local governmental unit is hereby authorized to issue securities under the provisions of this act and to sell such securities to the bank to raise money for any purpose or purposes set forth in Sections 21-27-23, 21-33-301, 21-33-325, 21-33-325.1, 21-33-326, 31-27-5, 17-17-301 et seq. and any other state law authorizing the issuance of local governmental unit debt, and for the purpose of refunding any securities issued under the provisions of this act or under the provisions of Section 21-27-11 et seq., or Section 21-33-301 et seq., or Section 31-27-1 et seq. Such securities may be issued in accordance with Sections 21-33-301, 21-33-303, 21-33-307, 21-33-309, 21-33-311, 21-33-313, 21-33-325, 21-33-325.1 and 21-33-326, or Sections 21-27-23 through 21-27-43 and Sections 21-27-47 through 21-27-71, or Sections 31-27-1 through 31-27-25, or Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11, or Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, or Sections 17-17-301 through 17-17-349 or any other state law authorizing issuance of local governmental unit debt, as the case may be, unless otherwise specifically provided in this act; provided, however, the securities of any local governmental unit may be issued with such terms and provisions as may be necessary and appropriate in order to comply with the provisions of any loan agreement described in Section 49-17-87. Whenever securities shall be issued under this subsection, the governing authority may also pledge to the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such securities the revenues of any project to be constructed, improved or purchased with the proceeds thereof. Whenever any project is a part of a system or combined system, then all or any portion of the revenues of such system or combined system may be pledged to secure repayment of such securities as determined by the bank.

Each local governmental unit is hereby authorized to issue securities to the bank to raise money for any purpose or purposes set forth in Section 19-9-1, 19-9-27 or 19-9-28 and for the purpose of refunding any securities issued under the provisions of this act or under the provisions of Section 19-9-1 et seq. Such securities may be issued in accordance with Sections 19-9-1, 19-9-3, 19-9-5, 19-9-7, 19-9-9, 19-9-11, 19-9-13, 19-9-15, 19-9-17, 19-9-27 and 19-9-28, or Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11, or Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, as the case may be, unless otherwise specifically provided in this act; provided, however, the securities of any local governmental unit may be issued with such terms and provisions as may be necessary and appropriate in order to comply with the provisions of any loan agreement described in Section 49-17-87. Whenever securities shall be issued under this subsection, the board of supervisors of the county may also pledge to the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such securities the revenues of any project to be constructed, improved, repaired or purchased with the proceeds thereof. Whenever any project is a part of a system or combined system, then all or any portion of the revenues of such system or combined system may be pledged to secure repayment of such securities as determined by the bank.

In addition, any local governmental unit is hereby authorized to issue securities to the bank to raise money for any purpose or purposes otherwise authorized by state law and for the purpose of refunding any securities issued under the provisions of this act or as otherwise authorized by state law including Section 49-17-83 et seq. Such securities may be issued in accordance with any other applicable provision of state law related to the issuance of securities including Section 49-17-83 et seq. Whenever securities shall be issued under this subsection, the governing body of such local governmental unit may also pledge to the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such securities the revenues of any project to be constructed, improved or purchased with the proceeds thereof. Whenever any project is a part of a system or combined system, then all or any portion of the revenues of such system or combined system may be pledged to secure repayment of such securities as determined by the bank.

Securities issued by a local governmental unit under the provisions of this act:

May be sold only to the bank at private sale and may be sold at such price or prices, in such manner and at such times as may be agreed to by the bank and the local governmental unit, and the governing body of the local governmental unit may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof;

Shall be secured as provided by Chapter 27, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972; Chapter 33, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972; or Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or other provisions of state law, and as provided in this act; and it is the intention of the Legislature that any pledge of earnings, revenues or other monies made by the local governmental unit shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made; that the earnings, revenues or other monies so pledged and thereafter received by the local governmental unit shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the local governmental unit irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof; and neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded;

Neither the officers or members of the governing body of the local governmental unit nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof;

Shall be issued for the purposes set forth in this act and shall include terms and conditions which meet the state law authorizing the issuance of such local governmental unit debt and/or such terms and conditions consistent with the requirements for issuance of Mississippi Development Bank Bonds under Section 31-25-37.

Each local governmental unit issuing securities under the provisions of this act is hereby authorized and empowered in connection with the issuance of such securities to enter into any covenants, agreements as to defaults and agreements as to remedies of the bank for defaults with respect to such local governmental unit’s operation, revenues, assets, monies, funds or property as may be prescribed by the bank.

The proceeds of securities shall be deposited in one or more special funds established by resolution of the local governmental unit issuing the same and shall be applied to the following: (a) the purpose for which the securities were issued; (b) the payment of all costs of issuance of the securities; (c) the payments of any fees and charges established by the bank; (d) the payment of interest on the securities for a period of time not greater than the period of time estimated to be required to complete the purpose for which the securities were issued; all to the extent provided by resolution of the governing body of the local governmental unit and approved by the bank. Such special fund shall be held by commercial banks qualified to act as depositories therefor.

In the event the bank determines to issue bonds and in connection therewith to exercise the powers provided in subsection (7) of Section 31-25-37, and if the requirements of subsection (2), (3) or (4), as the case may be, of this section have been satisfied, a local governmental unit is authorized to issue its securities as provided in this section.

Securities issued under this act may be validated in the manner and with the force and effect provided in Section 31-13-1 et seq.

This act shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental to any power conferred by other laws on local governmental units and not in derogation of any such powers.

Any person who attempts to or obtains financial aid for a local governmental unit hereunder or who attempts to or sells securities of a governmental unit to the bank by false or misleading information or who shall by fraud attempt to obtain monies from the bank or its approval for the payment of monies or shall fraudulently attempt to or does prevent the collection of any monies due to the bank shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony for each offense.

Upon the sale and issuance of any securities to the bank by any governmental unit, such governmental unit shall be held and be deemed to have agreed that in the event of the failure of such governmental unit to pay the interest on or the principal of any of such securities owned or held by the bank as and when due and payable, such governmental unit shall have waived any and all defenses to such nonpayment, and the bank upon such nonpayment shall thereupon constitute a holder or owner of such securities as being in default, and the bank may then and thereupon avail itself of all remedies, rights and provisions of law applicable in such circumstance, including, without limitation, any remedies or rights theretofore agreed to by the local governmental unit, and that all of the securities of the issue of securities of such governmental unit as to which there has been such nonpayment, shall for all of the purposes of this section be held and be deemed to have become due and payable and to be unpaid. The bank is hereby authorized and empowered to carry out the provisions of this section and to exercise all of the rights and remedies and provisions of law herein provided or referred to.

Any local governmental unit which borrows from the bank is hereby authorized and empowered to agree in writing with the bank that, as provided in this subsection, the State Tax Commission or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law shall (a) withhold all or any part (as agreed by the local governmental unit) of any monies which such local governmental unit is entitled to receive from time to time pursuant to any law and which is in the possession of the State Tax Commission, or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law and (b) pay the same over to the bank to satisfy any delinquent payments on any securities issued by such local governmental unit under the provisions of this act and any other delinquent payments due and owing the bank by such local governmental unit, all as the same shall occur. In the event the bank shall file a copy of such written agreement, together with a statement of delinquency, with the State Tax Commission, or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law then the State Tax Commission or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law shall immediately make the withholdings provided in such agreement from the amounts due the local governmental unit and shall continue to pay the same over to the bank until all such delinquencies are satisfied.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-25-28(7), (8) and (9), if the state or any agency thereof, the institutions of higher learning of the state or any education building corporation established for institutions of higher learning, borrows funds from the bank under Section 31-25-28 or sells its securities to the bank pursuant to this act, then such local governmental unit shall certify the following to the bank prior to the issuance of bonds:

The legal authority for such local governmental unit to borrow funds; and

That such local governmental unit does not intend to request an additional appropriation from the Legislature to pay debt service on the loan or for such security.

If the state or any agency thereof, the institutions of higher learning of the state or any education building corporation established for institutions of higher learning, does not make the certification required under paragraph (a) (ii) of this subsection, then such local governmental unit shall not borrow funds from the bank under Section 31-25-28 or sell its securities to the bank pursuant to this act unless an appropriation by the Legislature authorizes the payment of debt service for the first year of the loan or for such security.

Any local governmental unit may borrow money from the bank loaned under any loan guaranty program of any department or agency of the United States, including the United States Department of Agriculture Rural Utility Services Water and Waste Disposal Guaranteed Loan Program and Community Programs Guaranteed Loan Program or any such successor guaranty programs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each local governmental unit is authorized and empowered to contract with the bank for the exercise by the bank of any and all of the bank’s powers as set out in this act with respect to the proceeds of such local governmental unit’s securities or certificates of participation issued by such local governmental unit pursuant to any state law authorizing the issuance of local governmental unit debt.

Subsections (15) and (16) of this section shall be deemed to provide all necessary authority for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes and authorizations therein stated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 14; Laws, 1988, ch. 492; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 537, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 328, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 570, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 494, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 7, 2010).

§ 31-25-28.
Purpose for which loan may be made.

Local governmental units may borrow money or receive grants from the bank for any of the purposes set forth in this section or Section 31-25-20(g) and pay to the bank such fees and charges for services as the bank may prescribe. Whenever any such loan is made to a local governmental unit, such local governmental unit may use available revenues for the repayment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such loan, and pledge such available revenues or monies for the repayment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such loan. It is the intention of the Legislature that any such pledge of revenues or other monies shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made; that such revenues or other monies so pledged and thereafter received by the local governmental unit shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the local governmental unit irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof; and neither the resolutions, contracts or any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Local governmental units may contract with the bank with respect to any such loan and such contract shall contain such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the bank.

Local governmental units may in connection with any such loan enter into any covenants and agreements with respect to such local governmental unit’s operations, revenues, assets, monies, funds or property, or such loan, as may be prescribed by the bank.

Upon the making of any such loan by the bank to any local governmental unit, such local governmental unit shall be held and be deemed to have agreed that if such governmental unit fails to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on any such loan as when due and payable, such governmental unit shall have waived any and all defenses to such nonpayment, and the bank, upon such nonpayment, shall thereupon avail itself of all remedies, rights and provisions of law applicable in such circumstance, including, without limitation, any remedies or rights theretofore agreed to by the local governmental unit, and that such loan shall for all of the purposes of this section, be held and be deemed to have become due and payable and to be unpaid. The bank may carry out the provisions of this section and exercise all of the rights and remedies and provisions of law provided or referred to in this section and of all other applicable laws of the state.

Any local governmental unit that borrows from the bank under this section may agree in writing with the bank that, as provided in this subsection, the Department of Revenue or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law shall (a) withhold all or any part (as agreed by the local governmental unit) of any monies that such local governmental unit is entitled to receive from time to time pursuant to any law and that is in the possession of the Department of Revenue or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law and (b) pay the same over to the bank to satisfy any delinquent payments on any such loan made to such local governmental unit under the provisions of this section and any other delinquent payments due and owing the bank by such local governmental unit, all as the same shall occur. If the bank files a copy of such written agreement, together with a statement of delinquency, with the Department of Revenue or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law, then the Department of Revenue or any state agency, department or commission created pursuant to state law shall immediately make the withholdings provided in such agreement from the amounts due the local governmental unit and shall continue to pay the same over to the bank until all such delinquencies are satisfied.

Before authorizing any loan for any of the purposes enumerated in Section 31-25-20(e), the governing authority of the local governmental unit shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of the loan proposed to be authorized and the purpose for which the loan is to be authorized, and the date upon which the loan will be authorized. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such local governmental unit. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date fixed in such resolution for the authorization of the loan and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days before such date. If no newspaper is published in such local governmental unit, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such local governmental unit and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such local governmental unit. If fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors of the local governmental unit or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is the lesser, file a written protest against the authorization of such loan on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the authorization of such loan shall be called and held as otherwise provided for in connection with the issuance of general obligation indebtedness of such local governmental unit. Notice of such election shall be given as otherwise required in connection with the issuance of general obligation indebtedness of such local governmental unit. If three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors voting in the election vote in favor of authorizing the loan, then the governing authority of the local governmental unit shall proceed with the loan; however, if less than three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors voting in the election vote in favor of authorizing the loan, then the loan shall not be incurred. If no protest be filed, then such loan may be entered into by the local governmental unit without an election on the question of the authorization of such loan, at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the resolution. However, the governing authority of any local governmental unit in its discretion may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to authorize such loan as provided in this subsection.

[Repealed.]

In connection with any refunding of the Ten Million Five Hundred Seventy Thousand Dollars ($10,570,000.00), State of Mississippi, Department of Rehabilitation Services, Certificates of Participation (State of Mississippi, Department of Rehabilitation Services Project) dated August 1, 1993, the bank may issue its bonds to provide for such refunding and the Department of Rehabilitation Services may borrow money from the bank for the purpose of providing for the refunding of such Certificates of Participation. The Department of Rehabilitation Services may contract with the bank with respect to any loan from the bank under this paragraph (a), to provide for the refunding of such Certificates of Participation and such loan from the bank may include any terms and conditions as provided for in this section. In connection with the refunding of the Certificates of Participation pursuant to this paragraph (a), such refunding shall result in an overall net present value savings to maturity of not less than two percent (2%) of the Certificates of Participation being refunded.

The Department of Rehabilitation Services may borrow money from the bank in an amount not to exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) for the purpose of construction at, and repair and renovation, furnishing and equipping of, the department’s office building located in Madison, Mississippi.

In connection with any loan under this subsection (8), the Department of Rehabilitation Services shall not be required to meet the requirements of Section 31-25-27(14).

[Repealed.]

This section shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized by this section and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental to any power conferred by other laws on local governmental units and not in derogation of any such powers. Any loan made pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute an indebtedness of the local governmental unit within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or restriction. In connection with a loan under this chapter, a local governmental unit shall not be required to comply with the provisions of any other law except as provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 308, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 31-25-29.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

The bank may obtain the aid and cooperation of the local governmental units, including those not being assisted by the bank through the purchase of the municipal securities thereof, and the bank and such local governmental units shall have the power to enter into such agreements and arrangements as they deem necessary or advisable to obtain for the bank such aid and cooperation.

In addition to other powers of intergovernmental cooperation granted herein, all officers, departments, boards, agencies, divisions and commissions of the state are authorized and empowered to render any and all of such services to the bank as may be within the area of their respective governmental functions as fixed or established by law and as may be requested by the bank. All of such officers, departments, boards, agencies, divisions and commissions are authorized and directed to comply promptly with any such reasonable request by the bank as to the making of any study or review as to the desirability, need, cost or expense with respect to any local facility, or the financial feasibility thereof or the financial or fiscal responsibility or ability in connection therewith of any local governmental unit making application for financing by the bank. The cost and expense of any services requested by the bank shall, at the request of the officer, department, board, agency, division or commission rendering such services, be met and provided for by the bank.

The bank is authorized to accept such monies as may be appropriated by the state at any time or from time to time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-31.
Bonds issued by Bank as general or special obligations of Bank; issuance of bonds as affecting State’s obligation to levy or collect taxes or assessments; liability of State for payment of principal or interest.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, bonds issued by the bank under this chapter shall be general obligations of the bank or, if the resolution of the board authorizing their issuance shall so provide, shall be special obligations thereof payable solely from payments of principal, interest and redemption payments on the municipal securities being purchased with their proceeds or from such payments on any or all municipal securities held or to be held by the bank or from other funds available to the bank as provided in such resolution or by any provision of law. Bonds issued by the bank shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, or a debt or liability of the state or of any local governmental unit nor shall any such entity other than the bank (in the case of its general obligations) be liable thereon, nor shall bonds or any powers granted herein to the state or agency thereof or local governmental unit constitute the giving, pledging or loaning of the faith and credit of the state or such agency thereof or of such local governmental unit. The issuance of bonds hereunder shall not directly, indirectly or contingently obligate the state to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments therefor or to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments or make any appropriation for their payment nor to pledge the taxing power of the state and such levy or pledge is prohibited; however, notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any local governmental unit (including the state or any agency thereof) from assuming obligations in accordance with and subject to the limitations of this act or from issuing and selling municipal securities to the bank in accordance herewith. Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the bank to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of the state or authorize the bank to levy or collect taxes or assessments and bonds issued by the bank pursuant to the provisions of this act are payable and shall state plainly on their face that they are payable solely as general obligations of the bank, or solely from the funds pledged for their payment in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance or in any trust indenture or mortgage or deed of trust executed as security therefor, as the case may be, and are not a debt or liability of the state. The state shall not in any event be liable for the payment of the principal or interest on any bonds of the bank or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligations or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by the bank. No breach of any such pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit any local governmental unit (including the state or any agency thereof) from assuming obligations in accordance with and subject to the limitations of this act or from issuing and selling any security to the bank in accordance with this act.

Bonds issued by the bank under Section 31-25-21(k) for the purposes provided in Section 31-25-20(g) shall be general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection (2).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 16; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 537, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 2000).

§ 31-25-33.
Exemption from taxation.

As set forth in the declaration of finding and purpose herein, the bank will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this act, and the bonds of the bank issued pursuant to this act, and the income therefrom including any profit made on the sale thereof and all its fees, charges, gifts, grants, revenues, receipts, and other moneys received, pledged to pay or secure the payment of such bonds shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the municipalities and all other political subdivisions of the state.

The property of the bank and its income and operation shall be exempt from taxation or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the bank under the provisions of this act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-35.
Report; audit of books and accounts.

The bank shall submit to the Governor within ninety (90) days after the end of its fiscal year a complete and detailed report setting forth:

Its operations and accomplishments;

Its receipts and expenditures during such fiscal year;

Its assets, including an itemized list of municipal securities held by it, and liabilities at the end of its fiscal year, including the status of reserve or other special funds together with a statement of changes in its assets, liabilities and funds during such fiscal year; and

A schedule of its bonds outstanding at the end of its fiscal year, together with a statement of the amounts redeemed and incurred during such fiscal year.

The bank shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once a year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof shall be considered an expense of the bank and a copy thereof shall be filed with the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-37.
Issuance of bonds by bank for corporate purposes.

The bank shall have the power, from time to time, to issue bonds for any of its corporate purposes, including without limitation to pay bonds, including the interest thereon, and whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes. The refunding bonds may be exchanged for bonds to be refunded or sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of such bonds.

The bank shall have power to make contracts for the future sale from time to time of bonds, pursuant to which the purchaser shall be committed to purchase and the bank shall have the power to pay such consideration as it shall deem proper for such commitments.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3), every issue of bonds of the bank shall be general obligations of the bank payable out of any revenues or funds of the bank, subject only to the provisions of the resolution of the bank authorizing the issuance of, or to any agreements with the holders of, particular bonds pledging any particular revenues or funds. Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grants, subsidies, contributions, funds or moneys from the United States of America or the state or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or any other governmental unit. However, bonds issued by the bank under Section 31-25-21(k) for the purposes provided in Section 31-25-20(g) shall be general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such state general obligation bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering these provisions.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, a bond issued under this chapter is fully negotiable and each holder or owner of a bond, or of any coupon appurtenant thereto, by accepting the bond or coupon shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that the bond or coupon is fully negotiable for those purposes subject only to any provisions of bonds for registration.

Bonds of the bank shall be authorized by resolution of the board of the bank, may be issued as serial bonds payable in annual installments or as term bonds or as a combination thereof, and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premiums, as such resolution or resolutions may provide, except that no bond shall mature more than forty (40) years from the date of its issue. The bonds may bear interest at such rate or rates as the bank may by resolution determine, and such rate or rates shall not be limited by any other law relating to the issuance of bonds except that the interest rate on any bonds issued as general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi shall not exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101. The bonds and coupons appertaining thereto may be executed in such manner as shall be determined by the bank. In case any of the members or officers of the bank whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such members or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such members or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Bonds of the bank may be sold at public or private sale at such time or times and at such price or prices as the bank shall determine.

In connection with the issuance of bonds, the board of the bank may delegate to the executive director of the bank the power to determine the time or times of sale of such bonds, the amounts of such bonds, the maturities of such bonds, the rate or rates of interest of such bonds, and such other terms and details of the bonds, as may be determined by the board of the bank; provided, however, the board of the bank shall have adopted a resolution making such delegation and such resolution shall specify the maximum amount of the bonds which may be outstanding at any one time, the maximum rate of interest or interest rate formula (to be determined in the manner specified in such resolution) to be incurred through the issuance of such bonds and the maximum maturity date of such bonds. The board of the bank may also provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, in its discretion, (a) for the employment of one or more persons or firms to assist the bank in the sale of the bonds, (b) for the appointment of one or more banks or trust companies, either within or without the State of Mississippi, as depository for safekeeping, and as agent for the delivery and payment, of the bonds, (c) for the refunding of such bonds, from time to time, without further action by the board of the bank, unless and until the board of the bank revokes such authority to refund, and (d) other terms and conditions as the board of the bank may deem appropriate. In connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds, the board of the bank may arrange for lines of credit with any bank, firm or person for the purpose of providing an additional source of repayment for bonds issued pursuant to this section. Amounts drawn on such lines of credit may be evidenced by negotiable or nonnegotiable bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, containing such terms and conditions as the board of the bank may authorize in the resolution approving the same, and such notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall constitute bonds issued under their act. The board of the bank is authorized to pay all costs of issuance of the bonds.

Neither the members of the bank nor any other person executing the bank’s bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

Bonds of the bank may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the state, and without any other proceeding or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter and by provisions of the resolution authorizing such bonds.

Bonds of the bank may be validated in accordance with the provision of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11 in the same manner as provided therein for bonds issued by a municipality. Any such validation proceedings shall be held in the First Judicial District of Hinds County. Notice thereof shall be given by publication in any newspaper published in the City of Jackson and of general circulation through the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 19; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved February 24, 1997).